Hawaii statutes.
§431:13-204 Provisions of sections
additional to existing laws. The powers vested in the commissioner by this
article shall be additional to any other power to enforce penalties or fines
authorized by law with respect to the methods, acts, and practices hereby
declared to be unfair or deceptive. [L 1987, c 347, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol09_Ch0431-0435H
Next